Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB735.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 315.408 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall not require the use of an electronic track and trace system to
initiate, provide, receive, or maintain a pedigree by a person or entity licensed to
possess, distribute, dispense, or administer prescription drugs for use by an end user
until the FDA develops and implements standards for identification, validation,
authentication, and tracking and tracing of prescription drugs pursuant to 21 U.S.C.
sec. 355e. The electronic track and trace system requirements by the board shall
meet the FDA's standards for all prescription drugs covered by the FDA standards.
(2) Upon implementation of FDA standards for an electronic track and trace system,
the requirements relating to a pedigree in KRS 315.406 shall be superseded by the
FDA standards and shall not apply to any prescription drugs specified in the FDA
standards.
(3) Prior to promulgation of any administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A that
requires the use of an electronic track and trace system, the board shall consult with
manufacturers, wholesale distributors, and pharmacies regarding implementation of
the electronic track and trace system requirements and publish a report on its
website[Web site] about implementation issues, including but not limited to
universal availability, technical and operational feasibility, and reliability for
manufacturers, wholesale distributors, and pharmacies.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/25/2026 9:26 AM Jacketed